test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tuty_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - туты: # Verb 'take'
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg: тулдам
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg: тулдан
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg: туалд
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du: тулдман
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du: тулдамн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du: тулдтан
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du: тулдатн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du: тулднган
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du: тулданган
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl: тулдув
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl: тулдты
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl: тулдаты
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl: тулдат
# Object Singular
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+OcSg3: туэм
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+OcSg3: туэн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg+OcSg3: туэлд
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+OcSg3: туэмн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcSg3: туалдн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcSg3: тулдан
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+OcSg3: тулдан
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+OcSg3: туалдн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+OcSg3: тулдув
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+OcSg3: тулдан
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+OcSg3: туалдн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+OcSg3: туэлд
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+OcSg3: тулдалд
# Object Plural
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+OcPl3: туалдам
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg+OcPl3: тулдам
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+OcPl3: туалдан
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg+OcPl3: тулдан
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg+OcPl3: туалд
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+OcPl3: туалдамн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du+OcPl3: тулдамн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcPl3: туалдн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du+OcPl3: тулдан
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+OcPl3: туалдн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du+OcPl3: тулдан
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+OcPl3: туалдув
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl+OcPl3: тулдув
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+OcPl3: туалдн
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl+OcPl3: тулдан
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+OcPl3: туалдалд
     туты+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl+OcPl3: тулдалд
#Passive
#Passive
     туты+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc1Sg: туыюм
     туты+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc2Sg: туыйн
     туты+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc3Sg: туы
     туты+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc1Du: туыйман
     туты+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc2Du: туыйтан
     туты+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc3Du: туыйнган
     туты+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc1Pl: туыюв
     туты+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc2Pl: туыйты
     туты+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sc3Pl: туыят
